California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
As used in this article, “certificated aircraft” means aircraft operated by an air carrier or foreign air carrier engaged in air transportation, as defined in Section 40102(a)(2), (5), (6), and (21) of Title 49 of the United States Code, while there is in force a certificate or permit issued by the
 Federal Aviation Administration, or its successor,
 authorizing such air carrier to engage in such transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 15.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.

Certificated aircraft shall be deemed to be situated in this state only to the extent that such aircraft are normally physically present within the state, whether in flight or on the ground. To determine such extent for purposes of property taxation, the allocation formula specified by Section 1152 shall be applied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

1152.

For fiscal years before the 2020–21 fiscal year, the allocation formula to be used by each assessor is as follows:

(a) The time in state factor is the proportionate amount of time, both in the air and on the ground, that certificated aircraft have spent within the state during a representative period as compared to the total time in the representative period. For purposes of this subdivision, all time, both in the air and on the ground, that certificated aircraft have spent within the state prior to the aircraft’s first entry into the revenue service of
 the air carrier in control of the aircraft on the current lien date shall be excluded from the time in state factor. This factor shall be multiplied by 75 percent.

(b) The arrivals and departures factor is the proportionate number of arrivals in and departures from airports within the state of certificated aircraft during a representative period as compared to the total number of arrivals in and departures from airports during the representative period. This factor shall be multiplied by 25 percent.

(c) For the 1983–84 fiscal year until the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive, in computing the time-in-state factor, on each occasion during the representative period that
 a certificated aircraft has spent 720 or more consecutive hours on the ground, all ground time in excess of 168 hours shall be excluded from the time in state attributable to that aircraft.

(d) The time-in-state factor shall be added to the arrivals and departures factor.

(e) The figure produced by application of subdivision (d) equals the allocation to be applied to full cash value to determine the value to which the assessment ratio shall be applied.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 333, Sec. 2.   (SB 791)   Effective September 20, 2019.   Inoperative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 333.)
-------------------------------------------

1152.

For the 2020–21 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the allocation formula to be used by each assessor is as follows:

(a) The proportionate amount of time, both in the air and on the ground, that certificated aircraft have spent within the state during the 12-month period from January 1 through December 31 of the previous year immediately preceding the lien date as compared to the total time in the 12-month period from January 1 through December 31 of the previous year immediately preceding the lien date.

(b) Time in the air consists of flight time and taxi time within California’s borders. Time in the air shall be based on the State Board of Equalization’s “California Standard Flight Times”
 table in the most recently published Letter to Assessors that addresses intrastate and interstate standard flight times. These standard times shall be multiplied by the number of departures to and from the airports listed in the Letter to Assessors. 

(c) Ground time is all time in the state that is not flight or taxi time. Ground time at each airport shall be reported on a summary basis by fleet type pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 441. All ground time allocated to heavy maintenance that requires a certificated aircraft or scheduled air taxi to be removed from revenue service shall be excluded. An air carrier claiming an exclusion for heavy maintenance time shall identify such maintenance and supply sufficient documentation that will enable the assessor to confirm the amount of time the aircraft was not in revenue service. Routine line maintenance that does not require removal from revenue service shall not be excluded from time
 allocable to the airport.

(d) Time allocable to each airport is the amount of time a certificated aircraft or scheduled air taxi is on the ground at the airport computed pursuant to subdivision (c), plus the portion of incoming and outgoing flight time computed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) All time, both in the air and on the ground, that certificated aircraft have spent within the state prior to the aircraft’s first entry into the revenue service of the air carrier in control of the aircraft on the current lien date shall be excluded from the time-in-state factor.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 333, Sec. 3.   (SB 791)   Effective September 20, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1153.5.

(a) The Aircraft Advisory Subcommittee of the California Assessors’ Association shall, after soliciting input from commercial air carriers operating in the state, do both of the following:

(1) On or before March 1, 2020, and on or before each March 1 thereafter, designate a lead county assessor’s office for each commercial air carrier operating certificated aircraft in this state in that assessment year.

(2) Every third year thereafter, redesignate a lead county assessor’s office for each of these air carriers, unless an air carrier and its existing lead county assessor’s office concur to waive this redesignation.

(b) The lead county assessor’s office described in subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Calculate an unallocated value of the certificated aircraft of each commercial air carrier to which that assessor is designated.

(2) Electronically transmit to the assessor of each county in which the property described in paragraph (1) has situs for the assessment year the values determined by the lead county assessor’s office under paragraph (1).

(3) Receive the property statement, as described in subdivision (m) of Section 441, of each commercial air carrier to which the assessor is designated.

(4) Receive and electronically transmit to the assessor of each affected county flight data received pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (m) of Section 441.

(5) Lead the audit team described in subdivision (d) when that team is conducting an audit of a commercial air carrier to which the assessor is designated.

(6) Notify, in writing, each commercial air carrier for which the assessor has been designated of this designation on or before the first March 15 that follows that designation.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the county assessor of each county in which the personal property of a commercial air carrier has situs for an assessment year is solely responsible for assessing that property, applying the allocation
 formula set forth in Section 1152, and enrolling the value of the property in that county, but, in determining the allocated fleet value for each make, model, and series of certificated aircraft of a commercial air carrier, the assessor may consult with the lead county assessor’s office designated for that commercial air carrier.

(2) The lead county assessor’s office is subject to Section 322 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations and Sections 408, 451, and 1606 to the same extent as the assessor described in paragraph (1).

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 469, an audit of a commercial air carrier shall be conducted once every four years on a centralized basis by an audit team of auditor-appraisers from at least one, but not more than three, counties, as determined by the Aircraft Advisory Subcommittee
 of the California Assessors’ Association. An audit, so conducted, shall encompass all of the California Personal Property and fixtures of the air carrier and is deemed to be made on behalf of each county for which an audit would otherwise be required under Section 469.

(2) The audit team described in paragraph (1) shall do both of the following:

(A) Be the point of contact for all aircraft-related questions to or from each county and the commercial air carrier.

(B) Ensure that all aircraft-related concerns regarding the taxable value of the aircraft and aircraft parts are resolved with each county before finalizing the aircraft assessment with the commercial air carrier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 333, Sec. 5.   (SB 791)   Effective September 20, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1154.

(a) As used in this section, “air taxi” means aircraft used by an air carrier which does not utilize aircraft having a maximum passenger capacity of more than 60 seats or a maximum payload capacity of more than 18,000 pounds in air transportation and which holds a certificate of public convenience and necessity or other economic authority issued by the United States Department of Transportation, or its successor.

(b) Air taxis which are operated in scheduled air taxi operations are not subject to the provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 5301) of this division and shall be assessed in accordance with the allocation formula set forth in Section 1152.

(c) All other air taxis shall be assessed in
 the county where the aircraft is habitually situated in the same manner and at the same ratio as other personal property in the county subject to general property taxation. Such aircraft shall be taxed at the same rate and in the same manner as all other property on the unsecured roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   (AB 2688)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.

For purposes of Section 404, certificated aircraft shall be deemed to be situated only in those taxing agencies in which the aircraft normally make physical contact with sufficient regularity to entitle such agencies to tax the aircraft under the laws and Constitution of the United States. Flight time within the state shall be allocated as follows:

(a) If the aircraft takes off in one taxing agency which is entitled to tax (within the meaning of the preceding sentence) and lands in another agency which is entitled to tax, the flight time between such taxing agencies shall be allocated one-half to each such agency.

(b) If the aircraft arrives from out of state or leaves the state, the flight time from or to the state boundary shall be allocated to the taxing agency entitled to tax in which the aircraft first lands or last takes off, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to enlarge the right of any taxing agency to tax certificated aircraft in a manner not permitted by the laws or Constitution of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.

(a) After consultation with the California Assessors’ Association and representatives of commercial air carriers, the board shall, by emergency regulation, promulgate regulations and produce forms and instructions necessary to implement the allocation formula established for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, pursuant to Section 1152.

(b) An emergency regulation adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of
 Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 333, Sec. 6.   (SB 791)   Effective September 20, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Fractionally Owned Aircraft [1160. - 1162.]

1160.

For purposes of this article, all of the following apply:

(a) The following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Aircraft” has the same meaning as specified in Section 5303.

(2) “Fleet” means all aircraft operated by a manager of a fractional ownership program.

(3) “Fleet type” means aircraft classified by make, model, and series operated by a manager of a fractional ownership program.

(4) “Fractionally owned aircraft” or “aircraft operated in fractional ownership programs” means those aircraft registered with the Federal Aviation Administration as fractionally owned aircraft.

(5) “Landing” means physical contact involving the embarking or disembarking of crew, passengers, or freight, and that physical contact did not arise unintentionally as the result of an emergency.

(b) Revenues derived from the taxation of fractionally owned aircraft under this article shall be distributed in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5451) of Part 10 of this division.

(c) Fractionally owned aircraft shall be assessed under this article only if a lead county assessor accepts a designation as lead county assessor under Section 1162.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 180, Sec. 4.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1161.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, fractionally owned aircraft that has situs in this state shall be assessed on a fleetwide basis to the manager in control of the fleet and a notice of that assessment shall be issued to that manager.

(1) Any fractionally owned aircraft that has been annually assessed for the fiscal years preceding the 2007–08 fiscal year shall be assessed under this article commencing with the 2007–08 fiscal year.

(2) For fractionally owned aircraft that have not been annually assessed for the fiscal years preceding the 2007–08 fiscal year, assessment under this article applies for the 2007–08 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, and for preceding fiscal years for which an assessment was not made, and for which a statute of limitations either does not apply or has been waived.

(b) A fleet of fractionally owned aircraft establishes situs in this state if an aircraft within the fleet makes a landing in the state.

(c) A fleet of fractionally owned aircraft shall be assessed on an allocated basis. An allocation factor shall be established in each county for each fleet type of fractionally owned aircraft for which situs in this state has been established as described in subdivision (b). This allocation factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total number of landings and departures made by the fleet type in the county during the previous calendar year and the denominator of which is the total number of landings and departures made by the fleet type worldwide during the previous calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 180, Sec. 4.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1162.

(a) On or before October 1, 2007, the Aircraft Advisory Subcommittee of the California Assessors’ Association may designate a lead county assessor’s office for each manager in control of a fleet of fractionally owned aircraft.

(b) If a lead county assessor’s office is designated under subdivision (a), and that assessor’s office accepts that designation, the lead county assessor’s office described in subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify, in writing, each manager in control of a fleet of fractionally owned aircraft for which the lead county assessor has been designated of this designation on or before the first October 15 that follows that designation.

(2) Receive the property statement, as described in subdivision (l) of Section 441, of each manager in control of a fleet of fractionally owned aircraft for which the lead county assessor has been designated.

(3) Calculate, pursuant to Sections 5363 and 5364, an unallocated value of all fractionally owned aircraft for each manager in control of a fleet of fractionally owned aircraft for which the lead county assessor has been designated.

(4) Electronically transmit to the assessor of each county in which a fleet of fractionally owned aircraft has situs for the assessment year the value determined by the lead county assessor’s office under paragraph (3) and the allocation factor described in subdivision (c) of Section 1161.

(5) Lead the audit team described in subdivision (d) when that team is conducting an audit of each manager in control of a fleet of fractionally owned aircraft for which the lead county assessor has been designated.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the county assessor of each county in which a fleet of fractionally owned aircraft has situs for an assessment year is solely responsible for assessing that property by multiplying the unallocated value of each fleet type by the allocation factor described in subdivision (c) of Section 1161, and enrolling the total allocated value for the fleet type. In appraising the unallocated value of the fleet type, the assessor may consult with the lead county assessor’s office designated for that fleet.

(2) The lead county assessor’s office is subject to Section 322 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations and Sections 408, 451, and 1606 to the same extent as the assessor described in paragraph (1).

(d) Notwithstanding Section 469, an audit of each manager in control of a fleet of fractionally owned aircraft may be conducted once every four years on a centralized basis by an audit team of auditor-appraisers from at least one, but not more than three, counties, as determined by the Aircraft Advisory Subcommittee of the California Assessors’ Association. An audit, so conducted, shall encompass all of the California personal property and fixtures of the manager of the fleet of fractionally owned aircraft and is deemed to be made on behalf of each county for which an audit would otherwise be required under Section 469.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 180, Sec. 4.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Assessor’s Office Equipment [1251. - 1256.]

1251.

The board of supervisors shall furnish the assessor with the necessary office equipment, consisting of proper books, blanks, maps, office room, furniture, and stationery.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.

If the board of supervisors fails to furnish the assessor with the necessary office equipment, then, on the assessor’s application, the State Board of Equalization shall furnish it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

In any event, the cost of furnishing the assessor’s necessary office equipment is a county charge, payable like other county charges from the county general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

The State Board of Equalization shall prescribe the forms for the books, blanks, and maps, and may require the map books to:

(a) Be indexed by owners’ names.

(b) Show improvements and assessed value.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.

The maps shall show the private lands owned or claimed in the county so as to provide a legal description of the lands.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.

At the request of the assessor, the board of supervisors shall authorize and direct the assessor to prepare, or to supervise the preparation of, maps and block-books as may be needed for the assessor’s office to meet the requirements of the state board with respect thereto. All costs incurred in connection therewith shall be a charge against the county general fund, payable in the same manner as other county charges. This procedure shall be in addition to any other procedure relating to matters as may otherwise be provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1187, Sec. 19.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Responsibility of Assessor [1361. - 1367.]

1361.

The assessor and his sureties are liable on his official bond for all taxes on property which is unassessed through his wilful failure or neglect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1362.

Any taxpayer having the necessary knowledge may file with the board of supervisors an affidavit, alleging that certain property has escaped taxation through the wilful failure or neglect of the assessor, and giving the best description of the property that he can.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1363.

The board of supervisors shall then direct the district attorney to commence an action on the assessor’s bond for the amount of taxes lost through the assessor’s wilful failure or neglect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1364.

On the trial of the action, the value of the property unassessed shall be shown and judgment entered for the amount of taxes that should have been collected on it. The amount thus recovered shall be distributed like money received on redemption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1365.

(a) The county assessor and the employees of the assessor’s office shall not engage in any gainful profession, trade, business or occupation whatsoever for any person, firm, or corporation, or be so engaged in their own behalf, which profession, trade, business, or occupation is incompatible or involves a conflict of interest with their duties as officers and employees of the county. Conflict of interest shall include receipt of compensation or gifts from private persons or firms for advice or other services relating to the taxation or assessment of property.

(b) If the board of supervisors or the Attorney General finds that the assessor has violated any of the provisions of subdivision (a), such violation shall constitute malfeasance in office on the part of the assessor.

(c) If the assessor or the Attorney General finds that any of the employees of the assessor’s office has violated any provision of subdivision (a), such violation shall be grounds for dismissal of such employee by the assessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

1366.

Every assessor who fails to complete the local roll, or to transmit the statistical statement to the State Board of Equalization, forfeits one thousand dollars to the county, to be recovered on his official bond in an action brought in the name of the people by the Attorney General, when directed to do so by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1367.

Every county assessor shall ascertain the total assessed value of homes receiving the homeowners’ property tax exemption described in Section 218 and shall report to the board during each fiscal year, commencing with the 1979–80 fiscal year, the total valuation of properties receiving such exemption each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. EQUALIZATION [1601. - 2125.]



  CHAPTER 1. Equalization by County Board of Equalization [1601. - 1721.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [1601. - 1616.]

1601.

(a) For purposes of this article, “county board” shall mean a county board of supervisors meeting as a county board of equalization or an assessment appeals board.

(b) In counties of the first class, the clerk shall give notice of the time the county board will meet to equalize assessments by publication in a newspaper. 

(c) In all other counties, immediately upon delivery of the roll to the auditor, the clerk shall give notice of the period during which assessment protests will be accepted, the place where they may be filed, and the time the county board will meet to equalize assessments by publication in a newspaper, if any is printed in the county, or, if none, as directed by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

The roll or a copy thereof shall be made available for inspection by all interested parties during regular office hours of the officer having custody thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.

(a) A reduction in an assessment on the local roll shall not be made unless the party affected or his or her agent makes and files with the county board a verified, written application showing the facts claimed to require the reduction and the applicant’s opinion of the full value of the property. The form for the application shall be prescribed by the State Board of Equalization.

(b) (1) The application shall be filed within the time period from July 2 to September 15, inclusive. An application that is mailed and postmarked September 15 or earlier within that period shall be deemed to have been filed within the time period beginning July 2 and continuing through and including September 15.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the taxpayer does not receive the notice of assessment described in Section 619 at least 15 calendar days prior to the deadline to file the application described in this subdivision, the party affected, or his or her agent, may file an application within 60 days of receipt of the notice of assessment or within 60 days of the mailing of the tax bill, whichever is earlier, along with an affidavit declaring under penalty of perjury that the notice was not timely received.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the last day of the filing period shall be extended to November 30 in the case of an assessee or party affected with respect to all property located in a county where the county assessor does not provide, by August 1, a notice, as described in Section 619, to all assessees of real property on the local secured roll of the assessed value of their real property as it shall appear or does appear on the completed local roll, including the annual increases in assessed value caused solely by increases in the valuation of property that reflect the inflation rate, not to exceed 2 percent, pursuant to the authority of subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(A) The county assessor shall notify the clerk of the county board of equalization and the county tax collector by April 1 of each year as to whether the notice specified in this paragraph will be provided by August 1.

(B) The clerk shall certify the last day of the filing period and shall immediately notify the State Board of Equalization as to whether the last day of the filing period for the county will be September 15 or November 30.

(C) The State Board of Equalization shall maintain a statewide listing of the time period to file an application in each county.

(D) The provisions of Section 621 may not be substituted as a means of providing the notice specified in this paragraph.

(4) If a final filing date specified in this subdivision falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, an application that is mailed and postmarked on the next business day shall be deemed to have been filed within the requisite time period specified in this subdivision. If on any final filing date specified in this subdivision, the county’s offices are closed for business prior to 5 p.m. or for that entire day, that day shall be considered a legal holiday for purposes of this section.

(c) The application may be filed within 12 months following the month in which the assessee is notified of the assessment, if the party affected or his or her agent and the assessor stipulate that there is an error in the assessment as the result of the exercise of the assessor’s judgment in determining the full cash value of the property and a written stipulation as to the full cash value and assessed value is filed in accordance with Section 1607.

(d) Upon the recommendation of the assessor and the clerk of the county board of equalization, the board of supervisors may adopt a resolution providing that an application may be filed within 60 days of the mailing of the notice of the assessor’s response to a request for reassessment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 51, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The request for reassessment was submitted in writing to the assessor in the form prescribed by the State Board of Equalization and includes all information that is prescribed by the State Board of Equalization.

(2) The request for reassessment was made on or before the immediately preceding March 15.

(3) The assessor’s response to the request for reassessment was mailed on or after September 1 of the calendar year in which the request for reassessment was made.

(4) The assessor did not reduce the assessment in question in the full amount as requested.

(5) The application for changed assessment is filed on or before December 31 of the year in which the request for reassessment was filed.

(6) The application for reduction in assessment is accompanied by a copy of the assessor’s response to the request for reassessment.

(e) In the form provided for making an application pursuant to this section, there shall be a notice that written findings of facts of the local equalization hearing will be available upon written request at the requester’s expense and, if not so requested, the right to those written findings is waived. The form shall provide appropriate space for the applicant to request written findings of facts as provided by Section 1611.5.

(f) The form provided for making an application pursuant to this section shall contain the following language in the signature block:

I certify (or declare) under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing and all information hereon, including any accompanying statements or documents, is true, correct, and complete to the best of my knowledge and belief and that I am (1) the owner of the property or the person affected (i.e., a person having a direct economic interest in the payment of the taxes on that property—“The Applicant,” (2) an agent authorized by the applicant under Item 2 of this application, or (3) an attorney licensed to practice law in the State of California, State Bar No. ____, who has been retained by the applicant and has been authorized by that person to file this application.

(g) The clerk of a county board of equalization may accept an electronically filed application for changed assessment containing an electronic signature if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The application complies with all other requirements for filing the application.

(2) The electronic signature is accompanied by the certification described in subdivision (f).

(3) The electronic signature is authenticated in a manner that is approved by the county board of supervisors, which manner may include, but is not limited to, the use of personal identification numbers the clerk has assigned to applicants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.5.

(a) In the event a duplicate application for reduction in assessment is filed with the county board, the clerk may accept only the first application for reduction filed by or on behalf of the taxpayer, and may reject any duplicate application for reduction.

(b) For purposes of this section, “duplicate application for reduction” means an application for reduction filed by an applicant, or by his or her agent or attorney on his or her behalf, subsequent to an application for reduction previously filed by or on behalf of the same applicant, that seeks the same relief with respect to the same property for the same year in issue. A subsequent application for reduction that seeks to amend a previously filed application for reduction shall not be considered a duplicate application for reduction for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 388, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1604.

(a) (1) In counties of the first class, annually, on the fourth Monday in September, the county board shall meet to equalize the assessment of property on the local roll. It shall continue to meet for that purpose, from time to time, until the business of equalization is disposed of.

(2) In all other counties, annually, on the third Monday in July, the county board shall meet to equalize the assessment of property on the local roll. It shall continue to meet for that purpose, from time to time, until the business of equalization is disposed of.

(b) (1) An application for a reduction in an assessment filed pursuant to Section 1603 shall also constitute a
 sufficient claim for refund, if the applicant states in the application that the application is also intended to constitute a claim for refund pursuant to the provisions of Section 5097.

(2) The county board shall have no power to receive or hear any application for a reduction in an escaped assessment made pursuant to Section 531.1 nor a penal assessment levied in respect thereto, nor to reduce those assessments.

(c) If the county board fails to hear evidence and fails to make a final determination on the application for reduction in assessment of property within two years of the timely filing of the application, the applicant’s opinion of value as reflected on the application for reduction in assessment shall be the value upon which taxes are to be levied for the tax year or tax years covered by the application, unless either of the following occurs:

(1) The applicant and the county board mutually agree in writing, or on the record, to an extension of time for the hearing.

(2) The application for reduction is consolidated for hearing with another application by the same applicant with respect to which an extension of time for the hearing has been granted pursuant to paragraph (1). In no case shall the application be consolidated without the applicant’s written agreement after the two-year time period has passed or after an extension of the two-year time period previously agreed to by the applicant has expired.

The reduction in assessment reflecting the applicant’s opinion of value shall not be made, however, until two years after the close of the filing period during which the timely application was filed. Further, this subdivision shall not apply to applications for reductions in
 assessments of property where the applicant has failed to provide full and complete information as required by law or where litigation is pending directly relating to the issues involved in the application.

(d) (1) When the applicant’s opinion of value, as stated on the application, has been placed on the assessment roll pursuant to subdivision (c), and the application requested a reduction in the base year value of an assessment, the applicant’s opinion of value shall remain on the roll until the county board makes a final determination on the application. The value so determined by the county board, plus appropriate adjustments for the inflation factor, shall be entered on the assessment roll for the fiscal year in which the value is determined. No increased or escape taxes other than those required by a purchase, change in ownership, or new construction, or resulting from application of the inflation factor to the
 applicant’s opinion of value shall be levied for the tax years during which the county board failed to act.

(2) When the applicant’s opinion of value has been placed on the assessment roll pursuant to subdivision (c) for any application other than an application requesting a reduction in base year value, the applicant’s opinion of value shall be enrolled on the assessment roll for the tax year or tax years covered by that application.

(e) The county board shall notify the applicant in writing of any decision by that board not to hold a hearing on the applicant’s application for reduction in assessment within the two-year period specified in subdivision (c) or, if applicable, within the period as modified by subdivision (f). This notice shall also inform the applicant that the applicant’s opinion of value as reflected on the application for reduction in assessment shall, as a
 result of the county board’s failure to hold a hearing within the prescribed time period, be the value upon which taxes are to be levied in the absence of the application of either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (c).

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) or any other law, the two-year deadline by which a county board is required under subdivision (c) to render a final determination on a qualified application shall be extended until December 31, 2021. This extension of the two-year deadline shall apply retroactively to all qualified applications that have a two-year deadline under subdivision (c) occurring during the period beginning on March 4, 2020, through December 31, 2021, inclusive.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “qualified application” means a pending application for reduction in assessment of property as described in subdivision (c) that is timely filed with the county board and has a two-year deadline under subdivision (c) occurring during the period beginning on March 4, 2020, through December 31, 2021, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 31.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1605.

(a) An assessment made outside of the regular assessment period is not effective for any purpose, including its review, equalization and adjustment by the county board, until the assessee has been notified thereof personally or by United States mail at the assessee’s address as contained in the official records of the county assessor. For purposes of this subdivision, for counties in which the board of supervisors has adopted the provisions of subdivision (c) and the County of Los Angeles, receipt by the assessee of a tax bill based on that assessment shall suffice as the notice.

(b) Upon application for reduction in assessment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1603, the assessment shall be subject to review, equalization, and adjustment by the county board. In the case of an assessment made pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 75.10) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 0.5, or Article 3 (commencing with Section 501) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 that is made outside the regular assessment period as defined in subdivision (f), or an assessment made pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 531) of Chapter 3 of Part 2, the application shall be filed with the clerk in accordance with the applicable of the following:
